Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF797.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 134.31, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Prohibited material. new text end new text begin A library in a public school building must not contain any pornographic material. A library in a public elementary school must not contain any sexually explicit content. new text end